Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,110
Bonds; refunding; hearing on objections; appeal.

If on the day appointed in such notice, any written objections be filed, the objection or objections shall be heard and decided by the board of directors, and from its decision an appeal may be taken to the district court, in the manner of appeals from the county board.

Laws 1909, c. 158, § 3, p. 570;

R.S.1913, § 3524;

C.S.1922, § 2924;

C.S.1929, § 46-169;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,110.